klpt/data/ckb-Arab.aff
SFX A Y 731
SFX A 0 انە . ds:adverb
SFX A 0 تر .
SFX A 0 ترین .
SFX A 0 ترم .
SFX A 0 ترت .
SFX A 0 تری .
SFX A 0 ترمان .
SFX A 0 ترتان .
SFX A 0 تریان .
SFX A 0 ترەکە .
SFX A 0 ترێک .
SFX A 0 ترێ .
SFX A 0 ترەکان .
SFX A 0 تران .
SFX A 0 ترەکەم .
SFX A 0 ترەکەت .
SFX A 0 ترەکەی .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمان .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتان .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیان .
SFX A 0 ترێکم .
SFX A 0 ترێکت .
SFX A 0 ترێکی .
SFX A 0 ترێکمان .
SFX A 0 ترێکتان .
SFX A 0 ترێکیان .
SFX A 0 ترەکانم .
SFX A 0 ترەکانت .
SFX A 0 ترەکانی .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمان .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتان .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیان .
SFX A 0 ترانم .
SFX A 0 ترانت .
SFX A 0 ترانی .
SFX A 0 ترانمان .
SFX A 0 ترانتان .
SFX A 0 ترانیان .
SFX A 0 تردا .
SFX A 0 ترمدا .
SFX A 0 ترتدا .
SFX A 0 تریدا .
SFX A 0 ترماندا .
SFX A 0 ترتاندا .
SFX A 0 تریاندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەماندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترێکمدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکتدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکماندا .
SFX A 0 ترێکتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترێدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانماندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترانمدا .
SFX A 0 ترانتدا .
SFX A 0 ترانیدا .
SFX A 0 ترانماندا .
SFX A 0 ترانتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترانیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترڕا .
SFX A 0 ترمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترتڕا .
SFX A 0 تریڕا .
SFX A 0 ترمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترتانڕا .
SFX A 0 تریانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیانڕا .
SFX A 0 تریشم .
SFX A 0 تریشت .
SFX A 0 تریشی .
SFX A 0 تریشمان .
SFX A 0 تریشتان .
SFX A 0 تریشیان .
SFX A 0 تریشەکە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیش .
SFX A 0 ترێش .
SFX A 0 تریەکیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکەش .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیش .
SFX A 0 ترانیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشم .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشت .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشی .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمانیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشمان .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتانیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشتان .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیانیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشیان .
SFX A 0 ترێکمیش .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشم .
SFX A 0 ترێکتیش .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشت .
SFX A 0 ترێکییش .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشی .
SFX A 0 ترێکمانیش .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشمان .
SFX A 0 ترێکتانیش .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشتان .
SFX A 0 ترێکیانیش .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشیان .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشم .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشت .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشمان .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمانیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشتان .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتانیش .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشیان .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیانیش .
SFX A 0 ترانمیش .
SFX A 0 ترانیشم .
SFX A 0 ترانتیش .
SFX A 0 ترانیشت .
SFX A 0 ترانییش .
SFX A 0 ترانیشی .
SFX A 0 ترانمانیش .
SFX A 0 ترانیشمان .
SFX A 0 ترانتانیش .
SFX A 0 ترانیشتان .
SFX A 0 ترانیشیان .
SFX A 0 ترانیانیش .
SFX A 0 تریشدا .
SFX A 0 تریشمدا .
SFX A 0 تریشتدا .
SFX A 0 تریشیدا .
SFX A 0 تریشماندا .
SFX A 0 تریشتاندا .
SFX A 0 تریشیاندا .
SFX A 0 تریشەکەدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشمدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشتدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشیدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشماندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترێکمیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشمدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکتیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشتدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکییشدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشیدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکمانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشماندا .
SFX A 0 ترێکتانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشمدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشتدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشماندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترانمیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشمدا .
SFX A 0 ترانتیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشتدا .
SFX A 0 ترانییشدا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشیدا .
SFX A 0 ترانمانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشماندا .
SFX A 0 ترانتانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترانیانیشدا .
SFX A 0 تریشڕا .
SFX A 0 تریشمڕا .
SFX A 0 تریشتڕا .
SFX A 0 تریشیڕا .
SFX A 0 تریشمانڕا .
SFX A 0 تریشتانڕا .
SFX A 0 تریشیانڕا .
SFX A 0 تریشەکەڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکمیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکتیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکییشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکمانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکتانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانمیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانتیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانییشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانمانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانتانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیشیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترانیانیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترەوە .
SFX A 0 تریشەوە .
SFX A 0 تریشمەوە .
SFX A 0 تریشتەوە .
SFX A 0 تریشیەوە .
SFX A 0 تریشمانەوە .
SFX A 0 تریشتانەوە .
SFX A 0 تریشیانەوە .
SFX A 0 تریشەکەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەییەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکمەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکتەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکییەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکمانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکتانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانییەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانمەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانتەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانییەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانمانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانتانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشمەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشتەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشیەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەمانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشمانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەتانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشتانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەیانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکەشیانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکمیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشمەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکتیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشتەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکییشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشیەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکمانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشمانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکتانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشتانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترێکیشیانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشمەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشتەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشمانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانمانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشتانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانتانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیشیانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترەکانیانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانمیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیشمەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانتیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیشتەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانییشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیشیەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانمانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیشمانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانتانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیشتانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیشیانەوە .
SFX A 0 ترانیانیشەوە .
SFX A 0 ترینم .
SFX A 0 ترینت .
SFX A 0 ترینی .
SFX A 0 ترینمان .
SFX A 0 ترینتان .
SFX A 0 ترینیان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکە .
SFX A 0 ترینێک .
SFX A 0 ترینێ .
SFX A 0 ترینەکان .
SFX A 0 ترینان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەم .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەت .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەی .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەمان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەتان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەیان .
SFX A 0 ترینێکم .
SFX A 0 ترینێکت .
SFX A 0 ترینێکی .
SFX A 0 ترینێکمان .
SFX A 0 ترینێکتان .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانم .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانت .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانی .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانمان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانتان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیان .
SFX A 0 ترینانم .
SFX A 0 ترینانت .
SFX A 0 ترینانی .
SFX A 0 ترینانمان .
SFX A 0 ترینانتان .
SFX A 0 ترینانیان .
SFX A 0 تریندا .
SFX A 0 ترینمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینیدا .
SFX A 0 ترینماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەیدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینێدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینانمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینانتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینێڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینانمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینانتڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینانمانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینانتانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیانڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشم .
SFX A 0 ترینیشت .
SFX A 0 ترینیشی .
SFX A 0 ترینیشمان .
SFX A 0 ترینیشتان .
SFX A 0 ترینیشیان .
SFX A 0 ترینیشەکە .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیش .
SFX A 0 ترینێش .
SFX A 0 ترینیەکیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەمیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشم .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەتیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشت .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشی .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەمانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشمان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەتانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشتان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەیانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشیان .
SFX A 0 ترینێکمیش .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشم .
SFX A 0 ترینێکتیش .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشت .
SFX A 0 ترینێکییش .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشی .
SFX A 0 ترینێکمانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشمان .
SFX A 0 ترینێکتانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشتان .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشیان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانمیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشم .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانتیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشت .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشمان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانمانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشتان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانتانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشیان .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینانمیش .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشم .
SFX A 0 ترینانتیش .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشت .
SFX A 0 ترینانییش .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشی .
SFX A 0 ترینانمانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشمان .
SFX A 0 ترینانتانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشتان .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشیان .
SFX A 0 ترینانیانیش .
SFX A 0 ترینیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشیدا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشەکەدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەمیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەتیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشیدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەمانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەتانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەیانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکەشیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکمیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکتیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکییشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشیدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکمانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکتانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینێکیشیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانمیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانتیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانمانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانتانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیشیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینەکانیانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانمیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشمدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانتیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشتدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانییشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشیدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانمانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشماندا .
SFX A 0 ترینانتانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشتاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیشیاندا .
SFX A 0 ترینانیانیشدا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشمڕا .
SFX A 0 ترینیشتڕا .
